Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-104.1, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 291, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 6-104.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6-104.1. After exhausting sick leave and extended leave


pursuant to Sections 6-104 and 6-104.5 of this title and maternity


or paternity leave pursuant to Section 1 6-104.8 of this act title,


a full-time teacher who, with the proper approval of the district


board of education, takes not more than ninety (90) school days of


leave without pay to care for the teacher’s child during the first


year of the child’s life, shall receive full credit for the days on


leave without pay as though the teacher had been on leave with pay


for purposes of computing experience for the minimum teacher salary


schedule. A teacher on leave without pay pursuant to this section


who pays the actuarial cost, as determined by the Board of Trustees


of the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma, shall have the


period during which such leave without pay is taken, counted toward


retirement service credit as though the teacher had been on leave

Req. No. 2251 Page 2


with pay. The teacher shall notify his or her employer and the


System in writing within thirty (30) days from the date he or she


returns to service that he or she will pay such actuarial cost. The


teacher shall have up to twelve (12) months from the date he or she


returns to service to pay such actuarial cost.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-104.5, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 291, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 6-104.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6-104.5. A. If, after exhausting all sick leave


pursuant to Section 6-104 of this title and maternity or paternity


leave pursuant to Section 1 6-104.8 of this act title, a teacher is


absent from his or her duties due to personal accidental injury,


illness, or pregnancy, the teacher shall receive for a period of not


to exceed twenty (20) days his or her full contract salary less the


amount:


1. Actually paid a certified substitute teacher for his or her


position if a certified substitute teacher is hired; or


2. Normally paid a certified substitute teacher for his or her


position if a certified substitute teacher is not hired.


B. The district’s plan for sick leave benefits may provide that


the teacher is entitled to payment for accrued but unused sick leave


upon termination of employment.





Req. No. 2251 Page 3


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-104.6, as


amended by Section 4, Chapter 291, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 6-104.6), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6-104.6. A. The board of education of each school


district may establish a leave sharing program for all district


employees. The program shall permit district employees to donate


sick leave to a fellow district employee who is pregnant or


recovering from childbirth or who is suffering from or has a


relative or household member suffering from an extraordinary or


severe illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition


which has caused or is likely to cause the employee to take leave


without pay or to terminate employment.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Relative of the employee” means a spouse, child, stepchild,


grandchild, grandparent, stepparent, or parent of the employee;


2. “Household members” means those persons who reside in the


same home, who have reciprocal duties to and do provide financial


support for one another. This term shall include foster children


and legal wards even if they do not live in the household. The term


does not include persons sharing the same general house, when the


living style is primarily that of a dormitory or commune;


3. “Severe” or “extraordinary” means serious, extreme, or life-


threatening including temporary disability resulting from pregnancy,


miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom; and

Req. No. 2251 Page 4


4. “District employee” means a teacher or any full-time


employee of the school district.


C. A district employee may be eligible to receive shared leave


pursuant to the following conditions:


1. The board of education determines that the employee meets


the criteria described in this section; and


2. The employee has abided by district policies regarding the


use of sick leave.


D. A district employee may donate annual leave to another


district employee only pursuant to the following conditions:


1. The receiving employee has exhausted, or will exhaust,


maternity or paternity leave granted pursuant to Section 1 6-104.8


of this act title or sick leave earned pursuant to Section 6-104 of


this title due to pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth and recovery


therefrom, an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental


condition, which is of an extraordinary or severe nature, and


involves the employee, a relative of the employee, or household


member;


2. The condition has caused, or is likely to cause, the


employee to go on leave without pay or to terminate employment;


3. The board of education of the district permits the leave to


be shared with an eligible employee;


4. The amount of leave to be donated is within the limits set


by the board of education of the district; and

Req. No. 2251 Page 5


5. District employees may not donate excess sick leave that the


donor would not be able to otherwise take.


E. The board of education of each school district shall


determine the amount of donated leave an employee may receive.


F. The board of education shall require the employee to submit,


prior to approval or disapproval, a medical certificate from a


licensed physician or health care practitioner verifying the severe


or extraordinary nature and expected duration of the condition.


G. Donated sick leave is transferable between employees of


different school districts in the state with the agreement of both


boards of education of each school district.


H. The receiving employee shall be paid the regular rate of pay


of the employee. The sick leave received will be designated as


shared sick leave and be maintained separately from all other sick


leave balances.


I. Any donated sick leave may only be used by the recipient for


the purposes specified in this section.


J. Maternity or paternity leave granted pursuant to Section 1


6-104.8 of this act title and sick leave earned pursuant to Section


6-104 of this title available for use by the recipient shall be used


prior to using shared sick leave.


K. Any shared sick leave not used by the recipient during each


occurrence as determined by the board of education shall be returned


to the donor. The shared sick leave remaining will be divided among

Req. No. 2251 Page 6


the donors on a prorated basis based on the original donated value


and returned at its original donor value and reinstated to the


annual leave balance of each donor.


L. All donated sick leave shall be given voluntarily. No


employee shall be coerced, threatened, intimidated, or financially


induced into donating sick leave for purposes of the leave sharing


program.


M. In addition to the sick leave sharing program provided for


in this section, the board of education of each school district may


establish a sick leave sharing bank for all district employees. A


district employee may donate sick leave to a common fund which may


be used by any district employee who is eligible to receive shared


leave as set forth in subsection A of this section. The terms and


conditions for donation and use of sick leave to a leave sharing


bank shall be subject to the provisions of this section, unless


negotiations, entered into pursuant to Section 509.1 et seq. of this


title, between district employees and the school district establish


terms and conditions for a sick leave sharing bank in excess of


those provided for in this section.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 291, O.S.L.


2023, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 57, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S.


Supp. 2025, Section 6-104.8), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6-104.8. A. 1. Full-time employees of a public school


district in this state who have been employed by the school district

Req. No. 2251 Page 7


for at least one (1) year and have worked at least one thousand two


hundred fifty (1,250) hours during the preceding twelve-month


period;


2. Persons employed full time full-time as classroom


instructional employees of technology center school districts


supervised by the State Board of Career and Technology Education who


have been employed by the technology center school district for at


least one (1) year and have worked at least one thousand two hundred


fifty (1,250) hours during the preceding twelve-month period;


3. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of


Rehabilitation Services who have been employed by the State


Department of Rehabilitation Services for at least one (1) year and


have worked at least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours


during the preceding twelve-month period;


4. Persons employed full time full-time as correctional


teachers or vocational instructors by the Department of Corrections


pursuant to Section 510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes who


have been employed by a Department of Corrections facility for at


least one (1) year and have worked at least one thousand two hundred


fifty (1,250) hours during the preceding twelve-month period; and


5. Persons employed full time full-time as teachers by the


Office of Juvenile Affairs who have been employed by an Office of


Juvenile Affairs facility for at least one (1) year and have worked



Req. No. 2251 Page 8


at least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours during the


preceding twelve-month period,


shall be entitled to six (6) weeks of paid maternity or paternity


leave following the birth of the employee’s child. The six (6)


weeks of paid maternity or paternity leave shall be used immediately


following the birth of the school district employee’s child.


B. 1. Paid maternity or paternity leave provided pursuant to


paragraphs 1, 2, and 3 of subsection A of this section shall be in


addition to and not in place of sick leave due to pregnancy, as


authorized by Section 6-104 of this title.


2. Paid maternity or paternity leave provided pursuant to


paragraph 4 of subsection A of this section shall be in addition to


and not in place of sick leave due to pregnancy, as authorized by


Section 510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


3. Paid maternity or paternity leave provided pursuant to


paragraph 5 of subsection A of this section shall be in addition to


and not in place of sick leave due to pregnancy, as authorized by


Section 2-7-202 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. 1. Employees described in subsection A of this section


shall have the right to utilize accrued sick leave to extend the


duration of their maternity or paternity leave beyond the six (6)


weeks provided by subsection A of this section. Such sick leave may


be used for recovery from childbirth, bonding with a newborn, or


caring for a newborn, and shall not require additional approval from

Req. No. 2251 Page 9


a school district board of education or employer, provided the


employee has sufficient sick leave to cover the extended duration.


Sick leave used pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed six (6)


weeks, unless a licensed medical professional provides written


certification recommending additional leave for medical necessity


related to the employee’s recovery from child birth childbirth, or


for the care of the a newborn, to achieve a combined twelve (12)


weeks of FMLA Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (FMLA) leave in


accordance with paragraph 2 of this subsection.


2. An employee seeking to use sick leave to extend the duration


of their maternity or paternity leave shall notify their his or her


employer in accordance with the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993


(FMLA) FMLA. FMLA leave shall run concurrently with the paid sick


leave extended duration.


D. An employee who takes maternity or paternity leave pursuant


to the provisions of subsection A of this section shall not be


deprived of any compensation or other benefits to which the employee


is otherwise entitled.


E. Each fiscal year, the Legislature shall appropriate adequate


funding to the Public School Paid Maternity and Paternity Leave


Revolving Fund created in Section 6-104.9 of this title for the


purpose of providing paid maternity and paternity leave to eligible


school district employees pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A of


this section. If the Legislature does not appropriate adequate

Req. No. 2251 Page 10


funding specifically for the purpose of providing paid maternity and


paternity leave to school district employees, the State Board of


Education shall allocate from the funds appropriated to the State


Board of Education for the support of public school activities an


amount to fully fund paid maternity and paternity leave.


F. The State Board of Education, the State Board of Career and


Technology Education, the Commission for Rehabilitation Services,


the State Board of Corrections, and the Board of Juvenile Affairs


may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY Section 7, Chapter 291, O.S.L.


2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6-104.9), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 6-104.9. A. There is hereby created in the State


Treasury a revolving fund for the State Board of Education to be


designated the “Public School Paid Maternity and Paternity Leave


Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject


to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received


by the State Board of Education from state appropriations provided


for the purposes set forth in Section 6-104.8 of this title. All


monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated


and may be budgeted and expended by the State Board of Education for


the purpose of reimbursing school districts for expenses related to


providing paid maternity and paternity leave as provided for in


subsection B of this section. Expenditures from the fund shall be

Req. No. 2251 Page 11


made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims


filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


B. School districts in this state shall file claims with the


State Board of Education for reimbursement of expenses related to


providing eligible employees with paid maternity or paternity leave


as provided for in Section 1 6-104.8 of this act title.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY Section 8, Chapter 291, O.S.L.


2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6-104.10), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 6-104.10. A. There is hereby created in the State


Treasury a revolving fund for the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services to be designated the “Education Employee Paid


Maternity and Paternity Leave Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services from state appropriations provided for the


purposes set forth in Section 6-104.8 of this title. All monies


accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may


be budgeted and expended by the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for the purpose of reimbursing agencies for expenses


related to providing paid maternity and paternity leave as provided


for in subsection B of this section. Expenditures from the fund


shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against

Req. No. 2251 Page 12


claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


B. The Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education,


the State Department of Rehabilitation Services, the Department of


Corrections, and the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall file claims


with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for reimbursement of expenses related to providing eligible


employees with paid maternity or paternity leave as provided for in


Section 1 6-104.8 of this act title.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-7-202, as


last amended by Section 5, Chapter 291, O.S.L. 2023 (10A O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2-7-202), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-7-202. A. There is hereby created the Office of


Juvenile Affairs which shall be responsible for programs and


services for youthful offenders and juveniles alleged or adjudicated


to be delinquent or in need of supervision. The Executive Director


shall be responsible for established divisions and appointing


Division Directors division directors within the Office of Juvenile


Affairs.


B. Suitable office space shall be provided by the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services to the Office of Juvenile


Affairs, to the extent necessary for the Office to implement its


jurisdictional duties provided by the Oklahoma Juvenile Code, and


the Office may incur necessary expenses for office rent.

Req. No. 2251 Page 13


C. Effective July 1, 1995, the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall


be a Merit System agency and all employees of the Office of Juvenile


Affairs shall be classified employees who are subject to the


Oklahoma Personnel Act and the Merit System of Personnel


Administration, except as otherwise provided by law. Eligible


persons employed as teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall


be entitled to paid maternity or paternity leave as provided for in


Section 1 6-104.8 of this act Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Effective June 1, 2020, employees hired for service at the Southwest


Oklahoma Juvenile Center in Manitou shall be considered unclassified


and employed in a term-limited appointment. If state services


continue at the facility after the designated term, the employee may


be transferred into a non-term-limited position. Current employees


and employees hired prior to June 1, 2020, shall not be subject to


this provision.


D. Effective July 1, 1995, within its jurisdictional areas of


responsibility, the Office of Juvenile Affairs, acting through the


Executive Director, or persons authorized by law, rule, or


designated by the Executive Director to perform such acts, shall


have the power and duty to:


1. Advise, consult, cooperate, and enter into agreements with


agencies of the state, municipalities and counties, other states and


the federal government, and other persons;



Req. No. 2251 Page 14


2. Enter into agreements for, accept, administer and use,


disburse and administer grants of money, personnel, and property


from the federal government or any department or agency thereof, or


from any state or state agency, or from any other source, to promote


and carry on in this state any program within its jurisdictional


area of responsibility;


3. Require the establishment and maintenance of records and


reports;


4. Establish a system of training for personnel in order to


assure uniform statewide application of law and rules;


5. Enforce the provisions of the Oklahoma Juvenile Code and


rules promulgated thereunder and orders issued pursuant thereto;


6. Charge and receive fees pursuant to fee schedules


promulgated by the Board of Juvenile Affairs;


7. Conduct studies, research, and planning of programs and


functions, pursuant to the authority granted by the Oklahoma


Juvenile Code;


8. Enter into interagency agreements;


9. Provide administrative and support services to the Board of


Juvenile Affairs as necessary to assist the Board in the performance


of its duties;


10. Establish and maintain such facilities and institutions as


are necessary or convenient for the operation of programs for


children under the jurisdiction of the Office of Juvenile Affairs;

Req. No. 2251 Page 15


11. Lease, from time to time, any real property which the Board


of Juvenile Affairs shall determine advisable to more fully carry


into effect the operation of the Office of Juvenile Affairs in


accordance with applicable state statutes. All such leases for real


property shall be subject to the provisions of Section 63 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


12. Purchase or lease any equipment, supplies, or materials


pursuant to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act;


13. Contract for professional services;


14. Acquire, construct, extend, and operate any and all


facilities of all kinds which in the judgment of the Executive


Director and the approval of the Legislature shall be necessary or


convenient to carry out the duties of the Office of Juvenile


Affairs, as authorized by law;


15. Establish an employee recruitment and referral incentive


program and promulgate internal agency policy for the operation of


the program, which may include, but shall not be limited to, program


purposes, pay incentives for employees, eligibility requirements,


payment conditions and amounts, payment methods, payment recoupment,


and record keeping recordkeeping; and


16. Exercise all incidental powers which are necessary and


proper to implement and administer the purposes of the Oklahoma


Juvenile Code.



Req. No. 2251 Page 16


E. The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall maintain a fair,


simple, and expeditious system for resolution of grievances of all


persons committed to the Office of Juvenile Affairs regarding the


substance or application of any written or unwritten policy, rule of


the Board of Juvenile Affairs or of an agent or contractor of the


Office of Juvenile Affairs or any decision, behavior, or action by


an employee, agent, or contractor or by any other person committed


to the Office of Juvenile Affairs.


F. Effective November 1, 2012, the Office of Juvenile Affairs


shall establish a system of certification in accordance with the


Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing Act for the shelters


managed and operated by the Department of Human Services pursuant to


the requirements of Section 1-9-111 of this title. The Office of


Juvenile Affairs shall certify shelters pursuant to the requirements


of existing rules as established by the Oklahoma Commission on


Children and Youth until such time the Office of Juvenile Affairs


has promulgated rules for the certification of shelters.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 510.6a, as


amended by Section 6, Chapter 291, O.S.L. 2023 (57 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 510.6a), is amended to read as follows:


Section 510.6a. A. Persons certified to teach in this state


and meeting all minimum qualifications set by the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services, who are hired or employed as


correctional teachers or vocational instructors by the Department of

Req. No. 2251 Page 17


Corrections educational program, shall receive in salary the minimum


amounts specified in Section 1 18-114.15 of Enrolled Senate Bill No.


1119 of the 1st Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes multiplied by a factor of 1.20. Correctional


teachers serving as lead workers with supervisory responsibilities


shall receive the minimum amounts specified above multiplied by a


factor of 1.25. Correctional teachers who have a special education


certificate shall receive salary of an additional five percent (5%).


Correctional teachers shall receive the benefits set forth in


Sections 1370 and 1707 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


provided, however, correctional teachers shall not be eligible for


longevity payments pursuant to Section 840-2.18 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. Eligible persons employed as correctional


teachers or vocational instructors by the Department of Corrections


shall be entitled to paid maternity or paternity leave as provided


for in Section 1 6-104.8 of this act Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


B. Persons employed by the Department of Corrections school


system as nonteaching administrators shall be in the unclassified


service and shall not be placed under the classified service;


however, any classified employee occupying an administrative


position prior to July 1, 2000, shall retain the right to remain in


the classified service. At such time as such position becomes


vacant, it shall be placed in the unclassified service.

Req. No. 2251 Page 18


C. Except as provided by this section of law, the employment of


persons by the Department of Corrections educational program as


teachers or administrators shall be entirely governed by the


provisions of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes and any other laws


or rules regarding state employees and their employment; however, no


Department of Corrections correctional teacher or vocational


instructor, whose salary is calculated in accordance with the


provisions of this section, shall be entitled to receive any pay


increases for state employees authorized elsewhere in statute, rule,


or law. Correctional teachers or vocational instructors shall


receive any legislated pay increases granted in addition to the


Title 70 minimum salary schedule provided for in Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; provided, such increases are given to all common


education/vocational technical teachers.


D. The salaries for all correctional teachers and vocational


instructors shall be adjusted annually on July 1 unless legislation


authorizes a pay raise for educators with an implementation date


other than July 1, in which case the annual adjustment shall occur


on the date of the pay raise implementation.


E. The monthly salaries of correctional teachers and vocational


instructors employed by the Department of Corrections on the


effective date of this act July 1, 2005, will be adjusted according


to the procedures authorized in subsection A of this section on the


first day of the month following the effective date of this act July

Req. No. 2251 Page 19


1, 2005. Longevity payments will be eliminated in the month


following the effective date of this act July 1, 2005, for


correctional teachers and vocational instructors whose salaries are


calculated according to the provisions of this section. The


salaries of the employees governed by this section who are employed


on the effective date of this act July 1, 2005, will be


recalculated. The recalculation will be based on the provisions of


subsection A of this section for actual time employed as a


Department of Corrections correctional teacher or vocational


instructor between July 1, 2004, and the last day of the month in


which this act becomes effective July 2005. Authorized employees


will receive a one-time payment equal to the difference between the


recalculated salary amount and the compensation received.


SECTION 9. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 10. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2251 EB 12/30/2025 9:07:22 AM









Req. No. 2251 Page 20